Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB760.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 402(b) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 402. Imposition of Tax.--* * *(b) The annual rate of tax on corporate net income imposed by subsection (a) for taxable years beginning for the calendar year or fiscal year on or after the dates set forth shall be as follows:123456789101112131415161718192021 Taxable Year Tax RateJanuary 1, 1995,through December 31, 2022 9.99%January 1, 2023, through December 31, 2023 8.99%January 1, 2024, through December 31, 2024 8.49%January 1, 2025, through December 31, 2025 7.99%January 1, 2026, through December 31, 2026 [7.49%] 5.99%January 1, 2027, [through December 31, 2027] and each taxable year thereafter [6.99%] 4%[January 1, 2028, through December 31, 2028 6.49%January 1, 2029, through December 31, 2029 5.99%January 1, 2030, through December 31, 2030 5.49%20250HB0760PN0784 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 January 1, 2031, and each taxable year thereafter 4.99%]* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0760PN0784 - 3 - 12345